test/src/morphology/N-aswq25_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - asõq: # Noun (25) asõq 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     asõq+N+Sg+Nom: asõq
     asõq+N+Sg+Gen: [asõmõ, asõma]
     asõq+N+Sg+Par: asõnd
     asõq+N+Sg+Ill: [asõmõhe, asõmahe]
     asõq+N+Pl+Gen: [asõmidõ, asõndõ]
     asõq+N+Pl+Par: asõmit
     asõq+N+Pl+Ill: [asõmihe, asõndõhe]
     asõq+N+Pl+All: [asõmilõ, asõndõlõ]
